Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-8,141
Teacher Corps AmeriCorps Education Award Program; duties; legislative intent.

The Nebraska Volunteer Service Commission shall submit a program proposal to the Corporation for National Service to obtain funding for educational awards. The awards shall be used by the commission to (1) provide incentives for new college graduates to establish their teaching careers in Nebraska and (2) provide incentives for experienced Nebraska teachers to pursue graduate degrees. It is the intent of the Legislature that the State Department of Education shall provide state funding to the Nebraska Volunteer Service Commission to contract for a program officer position for the Teacher Corps AmeriCorps Education Award Program if the Corporation for National Service commits to funding such program in Nebraska. State funding provided by the State Department of Education shall be used by the Nebraska Volunteer Service Commission to contract for a program officer position to meet the required monitoring and compliance responsibilities of the program.

Laws 2000, LB 1399, § 24.